Vermont, session 2025-2026, H706.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 62 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 62. PROTECTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
* * *
§ 2432. INTERNET BROWSER OPT-OUT
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Browser” means an interactive software application that is used by
consumers to locate, access, and navigate websites.
VT LEG #386289 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.706
2026 Page 2 of 3
(2) “Opt-out preference signal” means a signal that complies with this
section and that communicates the consumer’s choice to opt out of the sale of
the consumer’s personal data.
(3) “Personal data” means any information, including derived data and
unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in
combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable individual
or to a device that identifies, is linked to, or is reasonably linkable to one or
more identified or identifiable individuals in a household.
(b) Prohibition.
(1) A business shall not develop or maintain a browser that does not
include functionality configurable by a consumer that enables the browser to
send an opt-out preference signal to the websites with which the consumer
interacts through the browser.
(2) The functionality required by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall
be easy for a reasonable person to locate and configure.
(c) Disclosure. A business that develops or maintains a browser shall make
clear to a consumer in its public disclosures how the opt-out preference signal
works and the intended effect of the opt-out preference signal.
VT LEG #386289 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.706
2026 Page 3 of 3
(d) Enforcement and rulemaking.
(1) A business that violates this section or rules adopted pursuant to this
section commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of
section 2453 of this title.
(2) The Attorney General shall have the same authority under this
section to make rules, conduct civil investigations, bring civil actions, and
enter into assurances of discontinuance as provided under chapter 63 of this
title.
(e) Safe harbor. A business that develops or maintains a browser that
includes a functionality that enables the browser to send an opt-out preference
signal pursuant to this section shall not be liable for a violation of this section
by another business that receives the opt-out preference signal.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386289 v.1